Utah statutes.
39-6-100.   Extortion.

A person subject to this chapter who communicates threats to another person intending to obtain anything of value or to influence any acquittal, advantage, or immunity is guilty of extortion and shall be punished as a military court directs.



Enacted by Chapter 210, 1988 General Session

